Utah statutes.
53B-3-103.   Power of board to adopt rules and enact regulations.
(1)  The board may enact regulations governing the conduct of university and
college students, faculty, and employees.
(2) (a)  The board may:
(i)  enact and authorize higher education institutions to enact traffic,
parking, and related regulations governing all individuals on campuses and
other facilities owned or controlled by the institutions or the board; and
(ii)  acknowledging that the Legislature has the authority to regulate, by
law, firearms at higher education institutions:
(A)  authorize higher education institutions to establish no more than one
secure area at each institution as a hearing room as prescribed in Section
76-8-311.1, but not otherwise restrict the lawful possession or carrying of
firearms; and
(B)  authorize a higher education institution to make a rule that allows a
resident of a dormitory located at the institution to request only roommates
who are not licensed to carry a concealed firearm under Section 53-5-704 or
53-5-705.
(b)  In addition to the requirements and penalty prescribed in Subsections
76-8-311.1(3), (4), (5), and (6), the board shall make rules to ensure that:
(i)  reasonable means such as mechanical, electronic, x-ray, or similar
devices are used to detect firearms, ammunition, or dangerous weapons
contained in the personal property of or on the person of any individual
attempting to enter a secure area hearing room;
(ii)  an individual required or requested to attend a hearing in a secure area
hearing room is notified in writing of the requirements related to entering a
secured area hearing room under this Subsection (2)(b) and Section 76-8-311.1;
(iii)  the restriction of firearms, ammunition, or dangerous weapons in the
secure area hearing room is in effect only during the time the secure area
hearing room is in use for hearings and for a reasonable time before and after
its use; and
(iv)  reasonable space limitations are applied to the secure area hearing room
as warranted by the number of individuals involved in a typical hearing.
(3)  The board and institutions may enforce these rules and regulations in any
reasonable manner, including the assessment of fees, fines, and forfeitures,
the collection of which may be by withholding from money owed the violator,
the imposition of probation, suspension, or expulsion from the institution,
the revocation of privileges, the refusal to issue certificates, degrees, and
diplomas, through judicial process or any reasonable combination of these
alternatives.
